District of Columbia statutes.
1-621.12

Evaluations; reports; audits.

(a)

The Mayor shall make periodic evaluations of the operation and administration of the health benefit plans provided under § 1-621.05.

(b)

Each contract entered into under § 1-621.04 shall require the carrier to:

(1)

Furnish reasonable reports as the Mayor determines necessary to enable the District to carry out its functions under this subchapter; and

(2)

Permit the Mayor to examine records of the carriers as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this subchapter.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2112
as added Oct. 1, 1987, D.C. Law 7-27, § 2(d), 34 DCR 5079

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-622.12.